District of Columbia statutes.
42-1706

Establishment of Real Estate Guaranty and Education Fund; Mayor to determine sum for deposit into Fund.

(a)

There is established a Real Estate Guaranty and Education Fund (“Fund”).

(b)

Except as provided in § 42-1707(k), on or after March 10, 1983, every real estate broker, real estate salesperson and property manager licensed under this subchapter shall, as a condition for renewing his or her license, pay in addition to any other fees required under this subchapter, the sum to be established by the Mayor for deposit into the Fund. On or after March 10, 1983, any person, before receiving an original real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or property manager license, shall pay, in addition to any other fees required under this subchapter, a sum to be established by the Mayor for deposit into the Fund.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 29, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(t), 31 DCR 4023
Delegation of authority under Law 4-209, see Mayor’s Order 83-123, May 6, 1983.
1981 Ed., § 45-1948.
This section is referenced in § 42-1702 and § 42-1707.